Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-147
Fire department; organization and equipment.

A city of the second class shall have the power to procure fire engines, hooks, ladders, buckets, and other apparatus, to organize fire engine, hook and ladder, and bucket companies, to prescribe rules of duty and the government of the fire department with such penalties as the city council may deem proper, not exceeding one hundred dollars, and to make all necessary appropriations for the fire department.

Laws 1879, § 39, IX, p. 201;

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 198;

R.S.1913, § 5041;

C.S.1922, § 4210;

C.S.1929, § 17-149;

R.S.1943, § 17-147;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 38.

Power given in this section to procure fire engines, hooks, ladders, etc., is totally different from the power to issue obligations unimpeachable in the hands of third persons in payment therefor. State ex rel. City of O'Neill v. Marsh, 121 Neb. 841, 238 N.W. 760 (1931).

A city may impose an occupation tax by ordinance upon a fire insurance company for the purpose of maintaining a volunteer fire department. German-American Fire Ins. Co. v. City of Minden, 51 Neb. 870, 71 N.W. 995 (1897).